Louisiana, session 2026, HB707.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1851(E)(1) and (F) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1851. Assessment
* * *
E.(1) The proceeds of the assessment and the interest earned on those
proceeds shall be used for market development and promotion of the use of liquefied
petroleum gas. Such marketing programs may include advertising on radio,
television, newspapers, magazines, billboards, websites, and online venues, as well
as sponsorships and participation in trade shows, consumer rebate programs to
encourage the purchase of propane appliances, and any other programs as
recommended by the Market Development Advisory Committee Board established
under Subsection F of this Section. The commission may enter into a cooperative
endeavor agreement with the Department of Agriculture and Forestry to facilitate the
market development and promotion activities required by this Paragraph.
* * *
F.(1) The commission shall establish a board to advise the commission on
the expenditure of funds collected under this Section. The executive director of the
commission may appoint one member of the commission to serve on the advisory
board as the commission's representative. One advisory board member shall be
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 707 ENROLLED
appointed by the commission from each commission inspector's area, as designated
by the commission, and two members shall be appointed at large. Each member of
the advisory board shall be a holder of a Class I, Class IV, or Class VI permit or have
worked in some capacity in the liquefied petroleum gas industry. Each class of
permit holders on which this Section levies an assessment shall have at least two
members one member who hold permits holds a permit for their respective classes
class on the advisory board. There shall be not more than nine members of the
advisory board. The advisory board members shall serve a term concurrent with that
of the governor and, in case of resignation, the appointee will fill the unexpired term.
Members shall not receive any compensation for serving on the advisory board.
(2) Meetings of the advisory board shall be advertised as required by the
Open Meetings Law and may be held in person or via electronic means.
(3) The number of members necessary to constitute a quorum shall be at
least one half of all advisory board members. For the purpose of making a quorum,
advisory board members who cannot participate in person or via electronic means
may send a proxy to attend a meeting in their absence if they provide written notice
to the chairperson no later than twenty-four hours before the scheduled meeting.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.